Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the installation of mini-split heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems has increased significantly across the state as consumers seek efficient, zonal heating and cooling options. State and local energy codes and electrification policies have further accelerated the adoption of these systems.The legislature further finds that electricians holding the HVAC/refrigeration specialty certification are trained and qualified to safely perform electrical connections between outdoor and indoor units of mini-split systems when those connections are made in accordance with manufacturer specifications. These connections involve standardized wiring methods, clearly identified terminals, and equipment certified as a system by accredited electrical product testing laboratories.The legislature also recognizes the need to ensure efficient, cost-effective installation of residential and light commercial HVAC systems. Allowing HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians to perform this limited electrical work reduces construction delays and costs while maintaining safety standards.Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the department of labor and industries to adopt rules clarifying that the scope of work for HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians includes specified electrical connections between indoor and outdoor components of mini-split HVAC systems.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department of labor and industries shall adopt rules under this chapter to clarify and define the scope of work for the HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician certification as it applies to mini-split HVAC systems.(2) The rules adopted under this section must allow individuals certified in the HVAC/refrigeration specialty to install, repair, replace, and maintain electrical connections between outdoor compressor or condenser units and indoor evaporator or air-handling units of mini-split HVAC systems, when:(a) The work is performed in accordance with the manufacturer's installation instructions;(b) The equipment is certified for use as a system by an electrical product testing laboratory accredited by the department; and(c) The electrical work is limited to circuits, wiring methods, and equipment integral to the operation of the mini-split system.(3) The department may, by rule, establish reasonable limitations on voltage, amperage, building occupancy, construction type, and installation conditions consistent with public safety and existing electrical code requirements.(4) Nothing in this section limits the department's authority to regulate electrical work, issue specialty certifications, or enforce compliance with the national electrical code and state electrical standards. However, rules adopted under this section may not prohibit HVAC/refrigeration specialty electricians from performing the work authorized by subsection (2) of this section.--- END ---